Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 8. Health Workforce Recruitment and Retention.

§ 32.1-122.20.
Recruitment and retention of health care providers.

The Commissioner shall direct the Commonwealth’s activities and programs for recruiting and retaining health care providers for underserved populations, underserved areas, and health professional shortage areas (HPSAs) designated throughout the Commonwealth. The duties and responsibilities of the Commissioner shall include, but not be limited to:

Designating and updating as necessary the designation of underserved areas that meet the criteria established by the Board pursuant to §

32.1-122.5

;

Designating and updating as necessary those areas of the state which meet the criteria of dental, primary care and mental health professional shortage areas as provided in 42 C.F.R. Part 5;

Administering the scholarship and loan repayment programs pursuant to Article 6 (§

32.1-122.5

et seq.) of this chapter as well as any other programs or activities authorized in the appropriation act for recruiting and retaining providers for the Commonwealth’s underserved populations, underserved areas and HPSAs;

Recruiting health care providers, residents, and students in Virginia and other states to care for Virginia’s underserved populations and practice in underserved areas and HPSAs throughout the Commonwealth;

Publicizing the functions, programs, and activities of the Department available to assist providers in establishing a practice in underserved areas and HPSAs throughout the Commonwealth;

Coordinating the Department’s health workforce activities with other state agencies as well as public and private entities in Virginia involved in health workforce training, recruitment, and retention; and

Identifying and recommending to the Governor and the General Assembly new programs, activities, and strategies for increasing the number of providers practicing in Virginia’s underserved areas and HPSAs and serving Virginia’s underserved populations.

History.

2000, cc. 175, 200; 2011, c. 37.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 37 deleted subdivision 8, which read: “Submitting annual reports, as required in §

32.1-122.22

, on the activities, accomplishments, and future plans of the Department in recruiting and retaining providers for underserved populations, underserved areas and HPSAs throughout the Commonwealth” and made
related changes.

§ 32.1-122.21.
Repealed by Acts 2010, cc. 187 and 488, cl. 2. See note for effective date.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, cc. 187 and 488, cl. 2 provides: “That upon the initial appointment of the Board of Directors for the Virginia Health Workforce Development Authority, §

32.1-122.21

of the Code of Virginia is repealed.” The board was appointed July 1, 2010.

Former §

32.1-122.21

, which established the Health Workforce Advisory Committee, was enacted by Acts 2000, cc. 175, 200.

§ 32.1-122.22.
Repealed by Acts 2011, c. 37, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2011.

Editor’s note.

Former §

32.1-122.22

, which required an annual report of health workforce activities, was derived from Acts 2000, cc. 175, 200.